Washington statutes.
RCW 11.68.060

Death, resignation, or disablement of personal representative—Successor to administer nonintervention powers—Petition.

If any personal representative of the estate of the decedent dies, resigns, or otherwise becomes disabled from any cause from acting as the nonintervention personal representative, the successor personal representative, or a person who has petitioned to be appointed as a successor personal representative, may petition the court for nonintervention powers, and the court shall act, in accordance with RCW 11.68.011 through 11.68.041 and 11.68.050.

[ 1997 c 252 s 63; 1977 ex.s. c 234 s 22; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 18.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Application, effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 234: See notes following RCW 11.20.020.

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.